Alabama, session 2026rs, SB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) No principal campaign committee,
political action committee, or political party, as those terms
are defined in Section 17-5-2, Code of Alabama 1975, may
accept any contribution, as defined in Section 17-5-2, Code of
Alabama 1975, made with a credit card via the Internet unless,
at the time of making the contribution: (i) the person making
the contribution provides to the principal campaign committee,
political action committee, or political party the credit card
verification value or code; and (ii) except as provided in
subsection (b), the billing address associated with the credit
card is located in the United States.
(b) If the contribution under subsection (a) is made by
a U.S. citizen living outside of the United States and the
credit card billing address is not a location in the United
States, the individual shall provide to the principal campaign
committee, political action committee, or political party, at
the time of making the contribution, the mailing address of
Page 1

the time of making the contribution, the mailing address of
SB92 Enrolled
the location in the United States which the individual uses
for voter registration purposes.
(c) The treasurer of each principal campaign committee,
political action committee, and political party shall maintain
the names and addresses of each person making a contribution
under this subsection for purposes of making reports under
Section 17-5-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Any credit card processor that processes credit
card contributions via the Internet to a principal campaign
committee, political action committee, or political party
without requiring the credit card verification value or code
and a zip code located in the United States or a billing
address located outside the United States is subject to a
forfeiture in an amount equal to the cumulative amount of the
contributions.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB92 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB92
Senate 12-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 09-Apr-26




Senate concurred in House amendment 09-Apr-26




By: Senator Orr
Page 3